District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.13

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act [this chapter], consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 113, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.